src/main/resources/bg_BG.aff
SFX T Y 94
SFX T   я         0         .
SFX T   я         е         .
SFX T   я         ейки      .
SFX T   я         ел        .
SFX T   я         ела       .
SFX T   я         елата     .
SFX T   я         ели       .
SFX T   я         елите     .
SFX T   я         елия      .
SFX T   я         елият     .
SFX T   я         ело       .
SFX T   я         елото     .
SFX T   я         ем        .
SFX T   я         ете       .
SFX T   я         ех        .
SFX T   я         еха       .
SFX T   я         ехме      .
SFX T   я         ехте      .
SFX T   я         еш        .
SFX T   я         еше       .
SFX T   я         ещ        .
SFX T   я         еща       .
SFX T   я         ещата     .
SFX T   я         ещи       .
SFX T   я         ещите     .
SFX T   я         ещия      .
SFX T   я         ещият     .
SFX T   я         ещо       .
SFX T   я         ещото     .
SFX T   я         й         .
SFX T   я         йте       .
SFX T   я         л         .
SFX T   я         ла        .
SFX T   я         лата      .
SFX T   я         ли        .
SFX T   я         лите      .
SFX T   я         лия       .
SFX T   я         лият      .
SFX T   я         ло        .
SFX T   я         лото      .
SFX T   ям        я         .
SFX T   ям        яй        .
SFX T   ям        яйки      .
SFX T   ям        яйте      .
SFX T   ям        ял        .
SFX T   ям        яла       .
SFX T   ям        ялата     .
SFX T   ям        яли       .
SFX T   ям        ялите     .
SFX T   ям        ялия      .
SFX T   ям        ялият     .
SFX T   ям        яло       .
SFX T   ям        ялото     .
SFX T   ям        яме       .
SFX T   ям        ян        .
SFX T   ям        яна       .
SFX T   ям        яната     .
SFX T   ям        яни       .
SFX T   ям        яните     .
SFX T   ям        яния      .
SFX T   ям        яният     .
SFX T   ям        яно       .
SFX T   ям        яното     .
SFX T   ям        ят        .
SFX T   ям        яте       .
SFX T   ям        ях        .
SFX T   ям        яха       .
SFX T   ям        яхме      .
SFX T   ям        яхте      .
SFX T   ям        яш        .
SFX T   ям        яше       .
SFX T   ям        ящ        .
SFX T   ям        яща       .
SFX T   ям        ящата     .
SFX T   ям        ящи       .
SFX T   ям        ящите     .
SFX T   ям        ящия      .
SFX T   ям        ящият     .
SFX T   ям        ящо       .
SFX T   ям        ящото     .
SFX T   я         т         .
SFX T   я         та        .
SFX T   я         тата      .
SFX T   я         ти        .
SFX T   я         тите      .
SFX T   я         тия       .
SFX T   я         тият      .
SFX T   я         то        .
SFX T   я         тото      .
SFX T   я         х         .
SFX T   я         ха        .
SFX T   я         хме       .
SFX T   я         хте       .
SFX T   я         ят        .
