src/main/resources/bg_BG.dic
благославям/T
валям/T
вбия/T
вечерям/T
видоизменям/T
вия/T
внасям/T
вперям/T
впия/T
встъпям/T
втрия/T
вшия/T
възвия/T
възгласям/T
възнасям/T
възправям/T
възхвалям/T
въргалям/T
гния/T
добавям/T
добия/T
довечерям/T
довия/T
догарям/T
договарям/T
доизмислям/T
доизпия/T
долавям/T
долепям/T
домия/T
донасям/T
дооформям/T
допия/T
доправям/T
допринасям/T
допълням/T
доразвия/T
доразкрия/T
доставям/T
дотеглям/T
дотътрям/T
доубия/T
дочуя/T
дуя/T
забавям/T
забарабаням/T
забелям/T
забия/T
забравям/T
забраням/T
забулям/T
завалям/T
завардям/T
заварям/T
завия/T
загарям/T
загасям/T
загнездям/T
загния/T
заговарям/T
загърлям/T
задавям/T
заделям/T
задирям/T
задръстям/T
задуя/T
задъням/T
зазубрям/T
заизвия/T
закалям/T
заканям/T
закапям/T
закашлям/T
закланям/T
закотвям/T
закрилям/T
закрия/T
закръглям/T
закъдрям/T
закъкрям/T
закърмям/T
залавям/T
залепям/T
заменям/T
замерям/T
замислям/T
замия/T
занасям/T
занемарям/T
заобикалям/T
заоблям/T
заострям/T
запалям/T
запеням/T
запия/T
заплюя/T
запомням/T
заправям/T
заравням/T
заравям/T
заразнасям/T
заразправям/T
зария/T
засланям/T
заставям/T
застрелям/T
застъпям/T
затварям/T
затоплям/T
затрия/T
затулям/T
затурям/T
затъркалям/T
затътрям/T
заудрям/T
захвалям/T
захвърлям/T
зачерням/T
зачоплям/T
зачуя/T
зашия/T
зашлевям/T
зашумям/T
злепоставям/T
избавям/T
избагрям/T
избелям/T
избикалям/T
избистрям/T
избия/T
избрулям/T
избрътвям/T
избръщолевям/T
избуя/T
избъбрям/T
извалям/T
извия/T
изгарям/T
изгасям/T
изглождям/T
изгния/T
изговарям/T
изготвям/T
издавям/T
издирям/T
издуя/T
изкалям/T
изкастрям/T
изкашлям/T
изкирливям/T
изкормям/T
изкумям/T
изкърпям/T
излавям/T
изменям/T
измислям/T
измия/T
измокрям/T
измъдрям/T
измъмрям/T
изнасям/T
изнервям/T
изоставям/T
изострям/T
изпия/T
изплюя/T
изпокрия/T
изпонапия/T
изправям/T
изпреварям/T
изпълням/T
изпъплям/T
изпъстрям/T
изравям/T
изрия/T
изстрелям/T
изстъпям/T
изтеглям/T
изтравям/T
изтрия/T
изтъркалям/T
изтътрям/T
изуя/T
изфъфлям/T
изхвърлям/T
изхитрям/T
изцъклям/T
изчервявям/T
изчерням/T
изчоплям/T
изшия/T
изщавям/T
калям/T
кашлям/T
кланям/T
крия/T
мислям/T
мия/T
набавям/T
набия/T
набрулям/T
набръщолевям/T
набъбрям/T
навалям/T
навечерям/T
навирям/T
навия/T
навървям/T
нагарям/T
нагиздям/T
нагласям/T
нагнездям/T
нагния/T
наговарям/T
наготвям/T
награбям/T
нагърбям/T
надварям/T
надвия/T
надвнасям/T
надиплям/T
надонасям/T
надоявям/T
надпия/T
надпреварям/T
надуя/T
надхвърлям/T
надхитрям/T
надървям/T
назорям/T
назубрям/T
назъбям/T
накалям/T
накастрям/T
наквасям/T
накипрям/T
накирливям/T
накланям/T
наковладям/T
наконтям/T
накъдрям/T
накърмям/T
налавям/T
налепям/T
намислям/T
намокрям/T
намъдрям/T
нанасям/T
наобикалям/T
наострям/T
наперям/T
напия/T
наплюя/T
напомням/T
направям/T
напудрям/T
напъплям/T
напъстрям/T
нария/T
насвия/T
насилям/T
наситням/T
наставям/T
настъпям/T
натапям/T
натеглям/T
натирям/T
натоварям/T
натоплям/T
натрия/T
натруфям/T
натурям/T
натъркалям/T
наудрям/T
наулавям/T
нахвалям/T
нахвърлям/T
нахлузям/T
нахлуя/T
нацепям/T
начерням/T
начупям/T
нашарям/T
нашия/T
нащърбям/T
недочуя/T
оагням/T
обагням/T
обагрям/T
обвия/T
обгарям/T
обезсмислям/T
обезформям/T
обикалям/T
обистрям/T
облепям/T
обменям/T
обмислям/T
обстрелям/T
обуславям/T
обуя/T
обшия/T
овалям/T
огелпям/T
огласям/T
ожулям/T
окалям/T
окастрям/T
окашлям/T
окрилям/T
омокрям/T
омърлям/T
опия/T
оплюя/T
опомням/T
оправям/T
определям/T
опърлям/T
ослабям/T
осланям/T
осмислям/T
оставям/T
отбия/T
отбрулям/T
отварям/T
отвия/T
отгласям/T
отговарям/T
отделям/T
открия/T
откърмям/T
отлепям/T
отмарям/T
отменям/T
отмия/T
отнасям/T
отоплям/T
отпарям/T
отпия/T
отправям/T
отравям/T
отрия/T
отроням/T
отсеням/T
отслабям/T
оттеглям/T
оттулям/T
отхвърлям/T
отшия/T
отъркалям/T
оформям/T
оцъклям/T
очерням/T
ощавям/T
пия/T
плуя/T
плюя/T
побавям/T
побия/T
поблазням/T
побратимявям/T
побъбрям/T
повалям/T
повия/T
повтарям/T
погаврям/T
погасям/T
подавям/T
подбия/T
подвия/T
подгоням/T
подготвям/T
подгърбям/T
поделям/T
подирям/T
подканям/T
подкастрям/T
подкрепям/T
подлепям/T
подлостям/T
подмамям/T
подменям/T
подмесям/T
подмия/T
подмокрям/T
поднасям/T
подонасям/T
подострям/T
подочуя/T
подправям/T
подпълням/T
подравням/T
подравям/T
подразделям/T
подразням/T
подрия/T
подръбям/T
подсирям/T
подставям/T
подуя/T
подхвърлям/T
подшия/T
подърлям/T
позабавям/T
позабравям/T
позагасям/T
позакашлям/T
позакръглям/T
позамислям/T
позаоблям/T
позапия/T
позатоплям/T
позачуя/T
поизкашлям/T
поизкрия/T
поизменям/T
поизместям/T
поизмия/T
поизмокрям/T
поизоставям/T
поизострям/T
поизпия/T
поизправям/T
поизпъстрям/T
поизравям/T
поизтеглям/T
поизтрия/T
покашлям/T
покварям/T
покланям/T
покрия/T
покъкрям/T
полуотварям/T
помислям/T
помия/KT
понабавям/T
понабия/T
понавирям/T
понавия/T
понагиздям/T
понаготвям/T
понадуя/T
понакалям/T
понакастрям/T
понамокрям/T
понаострям/T
понапия/T
понапомням/T
понасям/T
понатоплям/T
понатрия/T
понравям/T
пообикалям/T
пообмислям/T
поокалям/T
поокастрям/T
поопомням/T
пооправям/T
поотбия/T
поотварям/T
поотвия/T
поотделям/T
поотпия/T
попарям/T
попия/T
поплюя/T
попостоплям/T
поправям/T
попрегърбям/T
попрепия/T
попрехвърлям/T
попритварям/T
попритеглям/T
попритулям/T
попълням/T
поразварям/T
поразговарям/T
поразделям/T
пораздразням/T
поразмислям/T
поразправям/T
поразравям/T
поразтребям/T
поразтрия/T
поразчуя/T
поръбям/T
поръсям/T
посвия/T
посмъмрям/T
посрамям/T
поставям/T
постоплям/T
пострелям/T
потапям/T
потеглям/T
потретям/T
потрия/T
потулям/T
потътрям/T
похвалям/T
похлупям/T
почерням/T
почуя/T
пощурям/T
пребия/T
превалям/T
преварям/T
превия/T
превъзнасям/T
прегарям/T
прегласям/T
преговарям/T
прегърбям/T
предопределям/T
предоставям/T
представям/T
преживям/T
прежулям/T
прежурям/T
преизпълням/T
прекатурям/T
прекланям/T
прекръстям/T
прелистям/T
пременям/T
преместям/T
премислям/T
премия/KT
пренавия/T
пренагласям/T
пренасям/T
преобуя/T
преосмислям/T
преоткрия/T
препеням/T
препия/T
преповия/T
преповтарям/T
препокрия/T
преправям/T
препълням/T
преравям/T
преразделям/T
преразпределям/T
пресилям/T
престъпям/T
претапям/T
претеглям/T
претоплям/T
претрия/T
префиням/T
префърцуням/T
прехвърлям/T
прибавям/T
привия/T
привнасям/T
пригласям/T
приготвям/T
придирям/T
придобия/T
приклещям/T
прикрепям/T
прикрия/T
прилепям/T
принасям/T
припия/T
приповтарям/T
припомням/T
приправям/T
припъплям/T
присвия/T
присланям/T
пристъпям/T
притварям/T
притеглям/T
притулям/T
притурям/T
притътрям/T
прихлупям/T
причуя/T
пришия/T
пробия/T
провалям/T
проветрям/T
провъзгласям/T
прогарям/T
прогласям/T
прогния/T
проговарям/T
прозям/T
произнасям/T
прокашлям/T
променям/T
промислям/T
промия/T
промълвям/T
пропия/T
проправям/T
прославям/T
прострелям/T
противопоставям/T
протрия/T
прочуя/T
пързалям/T
разбия/T
разбръщолевям/T
разбулям/T
разбуням/T
разбъбрям/T
развалям/T
развихрям/T
развия/T
развървям/T
разгарям/T
разгащям/T
разгласям/T
разговарям/T
разгоням/T
разделям/T
раздиплям/T
раздразням/T
раздуя/T
разискрям/T
разкалям/T
разкашлям/T
разкрия/T
разкъдрям/T
разкървавям/T
разлепям/T
разлигавям/T
разлистям/T
разменям/T
размислям/T
размия/T
разнасям/T
разнищям/T
разпалям/T
разпарям/T
разпия/T
разплуя/T
разповия/T
разправям/T
разпределям/T
разпъпям/T
разравям/T
разрия/T
разсополивям/T
разставям/T
разстрелям/T
разтапям/T
разтварям/T
разтеглям/T
разтоварям/T
разтрия/T
разтурям/T
разхалтавям/T
разхвърлям/T
разхлабям/T
разциврям/T
разчоплям/T
разчорлям/T
разчуя/T
разшия/T
рия/T
самозабравям/T
самоопределям/T
самоотравям/T
самоподготвям/T
саморазправям/T
саморазтурям/T
самоубия/T
сбия/T
свалям/T
свия/T
сговарям/T
сготвям/T
сгърбям/T
сдиплям/T
сдобия/T
селям/T
скастрям/T
скланям/T
скрия/T
слепям/T
сменям/T
смия/T
смотолевям/T
смутолевям/T
смъмрям/T
снасям/T
спастрям/T
сподавям/T
споделям/T
сподирям/T
спомням/T
спотирям/T
спотулям/T
справям/T
сричкопренасям/T
срия/T
стапям/T
стоварям/T
стоплям/T
стрелям/T
стрия/T
счуя/T
събарям/T
събуя/T
съгласям/T
съпоставям/T
съставям/T
съсухрям/T
съшия/T
трия/T
турям/T
търкалям/T
убия/T
увия/T
угасям/T
угния/T
уговарям/T
удавям/T
удрям/T
укрия/T
улавям/T
умислям/T
умия/T
унасям/T
уния/T
уславям/T
ушия/T
хвърлям/T
чуя/T
шия/T
